Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.330

Audit disclosing malfeasance or nonfeasance—Action by attorney general.

If any audit of a state agency discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office on the part of any public officer or employee, within thirty days from the receipt of his or her copy of the report, the attorney general shall institute and prosecute in the proper county, appropriate legal action to carry into effect the findings of such post-audit. It shall be unlawful for any state agency or the responsible head thereof, to make a settlement or compromise of any claim arising out of such malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance, or any action commenced therefor, or for any court to enter upon any compromise or settlement of such action without the written approval and consent of the attorney general and the state auditor.

[ 1995 c 301 s 23; 1965 c 8 s 43.09.330. Prior: 1941 c 196 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 11018-5.]